California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the payment authorized pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000), excluding benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9, or amounts of those benefits.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the payment authorized pursuant to this section shall not be taken into account as income, and shall not be taken into account as resources for a period of 12
 months from receipt, for purposes of determining the eligibility of such individual, or any other individual, for benefits or assistance or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance under any state or local program not covered in subdivision (e). With respect to a state or local program, this subdivision shall only be implemented to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law relating to that program, and that any required federal approval or waiver is first obtained for that program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 15.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8165.)
-------------------------------------------

8162.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Better for Families Tax Refund Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, an amount necessary for the Franchise Tax Board to make the payments required under this chapter is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, from the Better for Families Tax Refund Fund to the Franchise Tax Board for the purpose of making the payments authorized by Section 8161.

(b) The Controller shall transfer from the General Fund to the Better for Families Tax Refund Fund an amount not in excess of the amount appropriated under subdivision (a).

(c) All payments returned shall be redeposited in the Better for Families Tax Refund Fund.

(d) Any unused moneys remaining in the Better for Families Tax Refund Fund for the purposes of this act shall be transferred to the General Fund by June 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8165.)
-------------------------------------------

8163.

Notwithstanding any other law, the state may contract with a third-party vendor for services relating to the distribution of payments made pursuant to this chapter in the form and manner best determined to expedite payment and mitigate fraud. A contract for services entered into pursuant to this section may include terms and conditions that are in the state’s best interest, but shall include an expiration date on each form of payment issued of no later than April 30, 2026, and a requirement that any unexpended or unclaimed balance of the payments issued shall, upon expiration, be returned to the Franchise Tax Board which will deposit the moneys in the General Fund, and all unused balances returned, no later than May 31, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 43.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8165.)
-------------------------------------------

8164.

(a) (1) A Better for Families Tax Refund payment made pursuant to Section 8161 shall be automatically exempt from a garnishment order.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a garnishment order in connection with an action for, or a judgment awarding, child support, spousal support, family support, or a criminal restitution payable to victims.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a financial institution receiving directly from the state the payments described in subdivision (a) shall exempt those payments from any garnishment order if the
 payment is marked by the state as a “Better for Families Tax Refund payment” or includes some other industry-standard unique identifier that is reasonably sufficient to allow the financial institution to identify the funds as a Better for Families Tax Refund payment.

(c) (1) In exempting a Better for Families Tax Refund payment from a garnishment order, a financial institution shall identify an exempt deposit using a lookback period during an account review.

(2) The financial institution shall perform a one-time account review consistent with the requirements described in subsection (a) of Section 212.5 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) A financial institution that attempts in good faith to comply with this section shall not be subject to liability or regulatory action under a federal or state law, regulation, court or other order, or regulatory interpretation for actions concerning applicable payments.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Account review” means the process of examining deposits in an account to determine if a benefit agency has deposited a benefit payment into the account during the lookback period.

(2) “Garnishment order” means a writ, order, notice, summons, judgment, levy, or similar written instruction issued by a court, a state or state agency,
 or a municipality or municipal corporation, including an order to freeze the assets in an account, to effect a garnishment against a debtor.

(3) “Lookback period” means the two-month period that begins on the date preceding the date of account review and ends on the corresponding date of the month two months earlier or on the last date of the month two months earlier if the corresponding date does not exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8165.)
-------------------------------------------

8165.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 4.9, commencing with Section 8160.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Indians [8200. - 8225.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration of Federal Funds [8200. - 8201.]

8200.

If provision is made by law of the United States for the administration by public agencies of this state of federal appropriations for the welfare of the Indians in this state, such state agencies may administer the expenditure of such federal appropriations within the scope of their legal powers.

The State Department of Health Services shall administer the expenditure of all such federal appropriations for the care and hospitalization of, and for medical attention to, sick or injured Indians and for the control and prevention of communicable and infectious diseases and general sanitation among the Indians in this state.

The State Department of Education shall administer the expenditure of such federal appropriations for the construction and maintenance of schools and the education of the Indians in this state.

The State Department of Social Services shall administer the expenditure of such federal appropriations for the relief of aged, infirm, and indigent Indians in this state.

Subject to such limitations as the law of the United States or the Secretary of the Interior lawfully imposes upon the administration of such funds, the state departments above mentioned may expend the same for the purposes within their respective jurisdictions which the respective heads of the departments deem best to conserve the interests and welfare of all the Indians residing within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

8201.

If the law of the United States requires the submission of budgets to the Secretary of the Interior or to any other federal agency before federal funds may be expended the state agencies may prepare budgets showing the amounts necessary during each year to carry out the purposes for which such federal appropriations are made, and shall submit such budgets when prepared to the State Department of Finance, who shall coordinate the same so far as possible and approve them before they are forwarded to the federal agency charged with receiving them. Thereafter the state agencies shall account directly to the federal disbursing and auditing officers for the expenditures of federal
 funds made subject to their administration, and the officers and employees of each department shall be responsible upon their official bonds to the federal disbursing and auditing officers for a proper accounting for all funds so disbursed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suits in Behalf of Indians [8225. - 8225.]

8225.

If the Attorney General of this state is authorized by any law of the United States to institute suits in the court of claims in behalf of the Indians of this state, and if the law of the United States provides for reimbursement of this state for all necessary costs and expenses incurred by this state in the event that the court renders judgment against the United States, the Attorney General may, with the approval of the Governor, cause such suits to be instituted, employ special counsel to assist in the prosecution thereof, and pay all necessary expenses incident thereto from moneys appropriated to the Attorney General. No reimbursement shall be made to this state for the
 services rendered by its Attorney General in person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Office of Special Services, Health and Welfare Agency [8250. - 8252.]

8250.

There is hereby created in the Health and Welfare Agency an Office of Special Services under the control of an executive officer appointed by and holding office at the pleasure of the Governor. The duties and functions of this office shall be to:

(a) Coordinate, oversee, direct and harmonize the work of the several offices, councils, commissions and boards in the Health and Welfare Agency.

(b) Assist such offices, councils, commissions and boards in meeting the goals and priorities each such unit has established.

(c) Assure that there is no duplication of work, effort or programs among or between the several offices, councils, commissions and boards.

(d) Render such services as may be needed by any such office, council, commission or board.

(e) Perform such special studies or services as may be requested by the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency or by any department within the Health and Welfare Agency with the express approval of the Secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

8251.

The Office of Special Services may enter into agreements and contracts with any person, agency, corporation or other legal entity and take such other action as is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The office may require state departments to contract with it for services to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

The Office of Special Services may accept and expend grants, gifts and legacies of money, and with the consent of the Department of Finance, may accept, manage, and expend grants, gifts, and legacies of other properties in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. California Interagency Council on Homelessness [8255. - 8257.3.]

8255.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Council” means the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, formerly known as the Homeless Coordinating and Financing Council established pursuant to Section 8257.

(b) “Core components of Housing First” means all of the following:

(1) Tenant screening and selection practices that promote accepting applicants regardless of their sobriety or use of substances, completion of treatment, or participation in services.

(2) Applicants are not rejected on the basis of poor credit or financial history, poor or lack of rental history, criminal convictions
 unrelated to tenancy, or behaviors that indicate a lack of “housing readiness.”

(3) Acceptance of referrals directly from shelters, street outreach, drop-in centers, and other parts of crisis response systems frequented by vulnerable people experiencing homelessness.

(4) Supportive services that emphasize engagement and problem solving over therapeutic goals and service plans that are highly tenant-driven without predetermined goals.

(5) Participation in services or program compliance is not a condition of permanent housing tenancy.

(6) Tenants have a lease and all the rights and responsibilities of tenancy, as outlined in California’s Civil, Health and Safety, and Government codes.

(7) The use of alcohol or drugs in and of itself, without other lease violations, is not a reason for eviction.

(8) In communities with coordinated assessment and entry systems, incentives for funding promote tenant selection plans for supportive housing that prioritize eligible tenants based on criteria other than “first-come-first-serve,” including, but not limited to, the duration or chronicity of homelessness, vulnerability to early mortality, or high utilization of crisis services. Prioritization may include triage tools, developed through local data, to identify high-cost, high-need homeless residents.

(9) Case managers and service coordinators who are trained in and actively employ evidence-based practices for client engagement, including, but not limited to, motivational interviewing and client-centered counseling.

(10) Services are informed by a harm-reduction philosophy that recognizes drug and alcohol use and addiction as a part of tenants’ lives, where tenants are engaged in nonjudgmental communication regarding drug and alcohol use, and where tenants are offered education regarding how to avoid risky behaviors and engage in safer practices, as well as connected to evidence-based treatment if the tenant so chooses.

(11) The project and specific apartment may include special physical features that accommodate disabilities, reduce harm, and promote health and community and independence among tenants.

(c) “Homeless” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 91.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) (1) “Housing
 First” means the evidence-based model that uses housing as a tool, rather than a reward, for recovery and that centers on providing or connecting homeless people to permanent housing as quickly as possible. Housing First providers offer services as needed and requested on a voluntary basis and that do not make housing contingent on participation in services.

(2) (A) “Housing First” includes time-limited rental or services assistance, so long as the housing and service provider assists the recipient in accessing permanent housing and in securing longer term rental assistance, income assistance, or employment.

(B) For time-limited, supportive services programs serving homeless youth, programs should use a positive youth development model and be culturally competent to serve unaccompanied youth under 25 years of age. Providers should work with the youth to
 engage in family reunification efforts, where appropriate and when in the best interest of the youth. In the event of an eviction, programs shall make every effort, which shall be documented, to link tenants to other stable, safe, decent housing options. Exit to homelessness should be extremely rare, and only after a tenant refuses assistance with housing search, location, and move-in assistance.

(e) “State programs” means any programs a California state agency or department funds, implements, or administers for the purpose of providing emergency shelter, interim housing, housing, or housing-based services to people experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness, with the exception of federally funded programs with requirements inconsistent with this chapter.

(f) “Council staff” means the
 individuals who work for the California Interagency Council on Homelessness and who are overseen by the executive officer of the California Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(g) “Executive council” means the California Interagency Executive Council on Homelessness created pursuant to Section 8257 and consisting of the members identified in subdivision (c) of Section 8257.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 107.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8256.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), agencies and departments administering state programs created on or after July 1, 2017, shall collaborate with the council staff to adopt guidelines and regulations to incorporate core components of Housing First.

(b) By July 1, 2019, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), agencies and departments administering state programs in existence prior to July 1, 2017, shall collaborate with the council staff to revise or adopt guidelines and regulations that incorporate the core components of Housing First, if the existing guidelines and regulations do not already incorporate the core components of Housing First.

(c) (1) For the Returning Home Well Program,
 the Specialized Treatment for Optimized Programming Program, and the Long-Term Offender Reentry Recovery Program, all of which are administered by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, which fund recovery housing, as defined in paragraph (3), for parolees, as defined by Section 3000 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do all of the following:

(A) In coordination with the council staff, consult with the Legislature, the California Housing and Homelessness Agency, the California Health and Human Services Agency, the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and other stakeholders to identify ways to improve the provision of housing to individuals who receive funding from that agency or department, consistent with the applicable requirements of state law.

(B) Comply with the core components of Housing First, other than those components described in paragraphs (5) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 8255.

(C) Ensure that recovery housing programs meet the following requirements:

(i) A recovery housing program participant shall sign an agreement upon entry that
 outlines the roles and responsibilities of both the participant and the program administrator to ensure individuals are aware of actions that could result in removal from the recovery housing program. Violations of the agreement shall not automatically result in discharge from the recovery housing program.

(ii) Efforts to link program participants to alternative housing options, including interim sheltering, permanent housing, or transitional housing, shall be documented. If a recovery housing program participant chooses to stop living in a housing setting with a recovery focus, is discharged from the program, or is removed from housing, the program administrator shall offer assistance in accessing other housing and services options, including options operated with harm-reduction principles, and identifying an alternative housing placement. This clause does not apply to an individual who leaves the program without notifying the program
 administrator.

(iii) The program administrator shall offer program participants who inform the program administrator that they are leaving the program one or more of the following:

(I) Tenant housing navigation services to permanent housing.

(II) Connections to alternative housing providers.

(III) Access to supportive services.

(IV) Intake into a locally-coordinated entry system.

(V) Warm handoff to a partner homeless services provider offering housing navigation.

(iv) The recovery housing program administrator shall track and report annually, to the program’s
 state funding source, the housing outcome for each program participant who is discharged, including, but not limited to, the following information:

(I) The number of homeless individuals with a housing need served by the program funds that year, as well as the demographics of the population served.

(II) Outcome data for all individuals served through program funds, including the type of housing that the individuals were connected to, the type of housing the individuals were exited to, the percent of housing exits that were successful, and exit types of unsuccessful housing exits.

(v) The department shall make every effort to ensure that exits to homelessness are extremely rare.

(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall make efforts to
 reduce recidivism by offering participation to formerly incarcerated persons in recovery housing programs. Connections to safe and supportive housing is a critical priority for successful community reintegration.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “recovery housing” means sober living facilities and programs that provide housing in a recovery-focused and peer-supported community for people recovering from substance use issues. Participation is voluntary, unless that participation is pursuant to a court order or is a condition of release for individuals under the jurisdiction of a county probation department or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(d) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2023, a grantee or entity operating any of the following state homelessness programs, as a condition of receiving state funds, shall enter the required data elements
 described in paragraph (8) on the individuals and families it serves into its local Homeless Management Information System, as required by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development guidance described in paragraph (8), unless otherwise exempted by state or federal law:

(A) The program referred to as Homekey, as described in Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The Housing for a Healthy California Program established pursuant to Part 14.2 (commencing with Section 53590) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The No Place Like Home Program established pursuant to Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5.

(D) The Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2
 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code).

(E) The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014, as established by Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 987.001) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(F) The Bringing Families Home Program, as established by Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 9.

(G) The CalWORKs Housing Support Program, as established by Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(H) The Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program, as established by Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6 of Division 9.

(I) The Community Colleges Homeless and
 Housing Insecure Pilot Project, as established by funds appropriated by the Budget Act of 2019.

(J) The Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program established in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50216) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Council staff, in consultation with respective administering state agencies or departments, shall specify the entry format and disclosure frequency for the programs subject to this subdivision to submit the data elements as specified in paragraph (1) to inform and meet the statewide objectives and goals described in Section 8257.

(3) (A) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall additionally apply to all new state homelessness programs that commence on or after July 1, 2021.

(B) New state homelessness programs and new grantees of the existing state programs described in paragraph (1) may be granted an extension of up to one year from program launch to meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, state homelessness programs are defined as those programs that are funded, in whole or in part, by the state with the express purpose of addressing or preventing homelessness or providing services to people experiencing homelessness. This definition shall be broadly construed
 for the purpose of carrying out the requirements of this subdivision.

(5) The requirements of paragraphs (1) and (3) do not supplant any existing requirements imposed on a grantee or entity operating a state program described in this subdivision that require the program to report data into their local Homeless Management Information Systems before January 1, 2023.

(6) (A) Any grantee or entity operating a program described in paragraph (1) or (3) that does not already collect and enter into the local Homeless Management Information System the data elements required under this subdivision shall, upon request, receive technical assistance and guidance from council staff and, as available, from federal partners, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(B) When a grantee or entity operating a program requests technical assistance, the council staff shall inform the respective administering state agency or department and offer the opportunity to partner or coordinate the provision of technical assistance.

(7) Any grantee or entity operating a program described in paragraph (1) shall, upon request, be granted an extension to meet the requirements in this subdivision, provided noncompliant grantees are making good faith progress towards meeting the requirements. An extension granted under this paragraph shall not extend beyond July 1, 2023. For purposes of this paragraph, “making good faith progress” includes, but is not limited to, engaging in technical assistance offered under paragraph (6) and establishing a plan to comply with this subdivision.

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, required data elements are the Universal Data Elements (Items 3.01–3.917) and the Common Data Elements (Items 4.02–4.20 and Item W5 of the Individual Federal Partner Program Elements) drawn from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development Homeless Management Information System Data Standards. When necessary, due to federal changes to the items indicated in this paragraph, the required data elements may be amended to maintain alignment with federal standards.

(9) Beginning January 1, 2022, council staff shall provide aggregate data summaries collected in full pursuant to this subdivision to the respective administering state agencies or departments that oversee relevant programs within 45 days of receipt. Where feasible, council staff shall notify the respective administering state agencies or departments at least 14 days before
 sharing, publicly using, or referencing the data, including, but not limited to, using the data for any substantive analysis, summary statistics, or other findings.

(e) The Board of State and Community Corrections Adult Reentry Grant programs that fund recovery housing subject to this chapter shall apply the requirements of this chapter prospectively beginning July 1, 2022, through any new contracts or agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 108.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.

(a) (1) There is in state government the California Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(2) There is, within the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, the California Interagency Executive Council on Homelessness, which shall support the California Interagency Council on Homelessness in meeting its goals.

(b) The California Interagency Council on Homelessness shall have all of the following goals:

(1) To oversee implementation of this chapter.

(2) To identify mainstream resources, benefits, and services that can be accessed to prevent and end homelessness in California.

(3) To create partnerships among state agencies and departments, local government agencies, participants in the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Continuum of Care Program, federal agencies, the United States Interagency Council on Homelessness, nonprofit entities working to end homelessness, homeless services providers, and the private sector, for the purpose of
 arriving at specific strategies to end homelessness.

(4) To promote systems integration to increase efficiency and effectiveness while focusing on designing systems to address the needs of people experiencing homelessness, including unaccompanied youth under 25 years of age.

(5) To coordinate existing funding and applications for funding. Any action taken pursuant to this paragraph shall not restructure or change any existing allocations or allocation formulas.

(A) To ensure eligible applicants are informed of opportunities to apply for funding, council staff shall develop and regularly maintain a strategic funding guide and a calendar of new or existing funding opportunities.

(B) Agencies and departments administering state programs shall provide the
 council staff updated information on new or existing funding opportunities on a quarterly basis.

(6) To make policy and procedural recommendations to legislators and other governmental entities.

(7) To identify and seek funding opportunities for state entities that have programs to end homelessness, including, but not limited to, federal and philanthropic funding opportunities, and to facilitate and coordinate those state entities’ efforts to obtain that funding.

(8) To broker agreements between state agencies and departments and between state agencies and departments and local jurisdictions to align and coordinate resources, reduce administrative burdens of accessing existing resources, and foster common
 applications for services, operating, and capital funding.

(9) To serve as a statewide facilitator, coordinator, and policy development resource on ending homelessness in California.

(10) To report to the Governor, federal Cabinet members, and the Legislature on homelessness and work to reduce homelessness.

(11) To ensure accountability and results in meeting the strategies and goals of the executive council.

(12) To identify and implement strategies to fight homelessness in small communities and rural areas.

(13) To create a statewide data system or warehouse, which shall be known
 as the Homeless Data Integration System, that collects local data through Homeless Management Information Systems, with the ultimate goal of matching data on homelessness to programs impacting homeless recipients of state programs, such as the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9) and CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9). Upon creation of the Homeless Data Integration System, all continuums of care, as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that are operating in California shall provide collected data elements, including, but not limited to, health information, in a manner consistent with federal law, to the Homeless Data Integration System.

(A) Council staff shall specify the form and substance of the required data elements.

(B) Council staff may, as required
 by operational necessity, and in accordance with paragraph (8) of subdivision (d) of Section 8256, amend or modify data elements, disclosure formats, or disclosure frequency.

(C) (i) To further the efforts to improve the public health, safety, and welfare of people experiencing homelessness in the state, council staff may collect data from the continuums of care as provided in this paragraph.

(ii) Council staff shall, upon request, share personally identifiable, individual-level data from the Homeless Data Integration System with an agency or department that is a member of the executive council for purposes of measuring housing instability and examining the effectiveness of, and need for, housing and homelessness programs and other antipoverty programs
 among Californians.

(iii) Council staff shall adopt and periodically publish system performance measures including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) The number of people experiencing homelessness who are accessing services.

(II) The number of people experiencing unsheltered homelessness on a single night.

(III) The number of people
 experiencing homelessness who are accessing services for the first time in the past two years.

(IV) The number of people exiting homelessness into permanent housing.

(V) The average length of time that people experienced homelessness while accessing services.

(VI) The percentage of people who return to homelessness within 6 months of exiting the homelessness response system to permanent housing.

(VII) The number of people with successful placements into shelter, interim, or permanent housing from street outreach.

(iv) For each of the system performance measures, council staff shall ensure that demographic data is tracked to identify age, gender, and racial and ethnic disparities.

(v) Before making any changes to the system performance measures pursuant to clauses (iii) or (iv), council staff shall provide a 30-day notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in writing, specifying the nature of the proposed changes. 

(vi) Data disclosed pursuant to this subparagraph shall be in compliance with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(D) Any health information or personal identifying information provided to, or maintained within, the Homeless Data Integration System shall not be subject to public inspection or disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(E) For purposes of this paragraph, “health
 information” includes “protected health information,” as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and “medical information,” as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(14) To set goals to prevent and end homelessness among California’s youth.

(15) To improve the safety, health, and welfare of young people experiencing homelessness in the state.

(16) To increase system integration and coordinating efforts to prevent homelessness among youth who are currently or formerly involved in the child welfare system or the juvenile justice system.

(17) To lead efforts to coordinate a spectrum of funding, policy, and practice efforts related to young people experiencing homelessness.

(18) To identify best practices to ensure homeless minors who may have experienced maltreatment, as described in Section 300, are appropriately referred to, or have the ability to self-refer to, the child welfare system.

(19) To collect, compile, and make available to the public financial data provided to the council staff from all state-funded homelessness programs.

(A) (i) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, and every fiscal year thereafter, council staff shall collect fiscal and outcome data from state agencies and departments administering state homelessness programs with a grantee or entity that is required to enter data elements on individuals and families it serves pursuant to
 paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 8256. The state agencies and departments shall submit the fiscal and outcome data to council staff on or before February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter.

(ii) Council staff, in collaboration with the respective administering state agencies or departments, shall specify the data elements, entry format, and disclosure frequency of fiscal and outcome data.

(iii) Council staff may aggregate fiscal and outcome data in a manner it sees fit, and, in consultation with the respective administering state agencies or departments, shall make the data publicly available on or before June 1, 2027, and annually thereafter.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph:

(i) “Fiscal data” includes, but is not limited to,
 funding sources, budget allocations, obligations, and expenditures, and any other financial data needed to assess a state homelessness program. Fiscal data collected pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be limited to only the data authorized to be collected or requested from a grantee by administering agencies and departments based on the specific program’s authority or grant agreement.

(ii) “Outcome data” includes, but is not limited to, data relating to people exiting into permanent housing and data elements described in subdivision (d) of Section 8256. Outcome data collected pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be limited to only the data authorized to be collected or requested from a grantee by administering agencies and departments based on the specific program’s authority or grant agreement.

(c) (1) The
 executive council shall consist of the following members:

(A) The Secretary of the California Housing and Homelessness Agency and the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, who both shall serve as cochairs of the executive council.

(B) The Director of Transportation.

(C) The Director of Housing and Community Development.

(D) The Director of Social Services.

(E) The executive director of the California Housing Finance Agency.

(F) The Director or the State Medicaid Director of Health Care Services.

(G) The Secretary of Veterans Affairs.

(H) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(I) The Governor’s Tribal Advisor.

(J) The Executive Director of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee in the Treasurer’s office.

(K) The State Public Health Officer.

(L) The Director of the California Department of Aging.

(M) The Director of Rehabilitation.

(N) The Director of State Hospitals.

(O) The executive director of the California Workforce Development Board.

(P) The Director of Emergency Services.

(Q) A representative from the State Department of Education, who shall be appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(R) A representative of the state public higher education system who shall be from one of the following:

(i) The California Community
 Colleges.

(ii) The University of California.

(iii) The California State University.

(2) The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one member to the executive council from two different stakeholder organizations.

(3) The executive council may, at its discretion, invite stakeholders, individuals who have experienced homelessness, members of philanthropic communities, and experts to participate in meetings or provide information to the
 executive council.

(4) The executive council shall hold public meetings at least once every quarter.

(d) The executive council shall regularly seek guidance from and, at least twice a year, meet with an advisory committee. Notwithstanding Section 11123.5 of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), all members of the advisory committee may participate remotely in advisory committee meetings, including meetings held with the executive
 council, and no members are required to be present at the designated primary physical meeting location. The cochairs of the executive council shall appoint members to this advisory committee that reflects racial and gender diversity, and shall include the following:
